Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
Article 4 Employee Assistance Program

45-20-70.
“Employee assistance program” defined.

As used in this article, the term “employee assistance program” or “program” means a service established to assist state employees in coping with and overcoming persistent problems that jeopardize the employee’s effective job performance.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-20-70

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 990, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 13, § 45; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 1-1/HB 642.

45-20-70.1.
Program authorized.

The board is authorized in its discretion to establish an employee assistance program for all state employees and to adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for its administration.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-20-70.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 13, § 45; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1377, § 5; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 1-1/HB 642.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

45-20-71.
Confidentiality of program related records or activities.

Program related records or activities which might disclose the nature of the services provided an employee or the identity of an employee utilizing the program shall be maintained on a confidential basis. Such records shall be produced only when the commissioner or his or her designee is satisfied it is needed to respond to a life-threatening or medical emergency or when written release is given by that employee.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-20-71

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 990, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1377, § 5; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 1-1/HB 642.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”